Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.300

Financial fraud and identity theft crimes investigation and prosecution program. (Expires July 1, 2030.)

(1) The financial fraud and identity theft crimes investigation and prosecution program is created in the department of commerce. The department shall:

(a) Appoint members of the financial fraud task forces created in subsection (2) of this section;

(b) Administer the account created in subsection (3) of this section; and

(c) By December 31st of each year submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor regarding the progress of the program and task forces. The report must include information regarding the use of funds and funding needs to facilitate a biennial review of the program's funding. The report must also include recommendations on changes to the program, including expansion.

(2)(a) The department shall establish two regional financial fraud and identity theft crime task forces that include a central Puget Sound task force that includes King, Pierce, and Snohomish counties, and a Spokane county task force. Each task force must be comprised of local law enforcement, county prosecutors, representatives of the office of the attorney general, financial institutions, and other state and local law enforcement.

(b) The department shall appoint: (i) Representatives of local law enforcement from a list provided by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs; (ii) representatives of county prosecutors from a list provided by the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys; and (iii) representatives of financial institutions.

(c) Each task force shall:

(i) Hold regular meetings to discuss emerging trends and threats of local financial fraud and identity theft crimes;

(ii) Set priorities for the activities for the task force;

(iii) Apply to the department for funding to (A) hire prosecutors and/or law enforcement personnel dedicated to investigating and prosecuting financial fraud and identity theft crimes; and (B) acquire other needed resources to conduct the work of the task force;

(iv) Establish outcome-based performance measures; and

(v) Twice annually report to the department regarding the activities and performance of the task force.

(3) The financial fraud and identity theft crimes investigation and prosecution account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Revenue to the account may include appropriations, revenues generated by the surcharge imposed in RCW 62A.9A-525, federal funds, and any other gifts or grants. Expenditures from the account may be used only to support the activities of the financial fraud and identity theft crime investigation and prosecution task forces and the program administrative expenses of the department, which may not exceed ten percent of the amount appropriated.

(4) For purposes of this section, "financial fraud and identity theft crimes" includes those that involve: Check fraud, chronic unlawful issuance of bank checks, embezzlement, credit/debit card fraud, identity theft, forgery, counterfeit instruments such as checks or documents, organized counterfeit check rings, and organized identification theft rings.

(5) This section expires July 1, 2030.

[ 2020 c 60 s 1; 2015 c 65 s 1; 2009 c 565 s 16; 2008 c 290 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 65: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2015." [ 2015 c 65 s 5.]